Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-681
Municipal utilities; service; rates; regulation.

Any city of the first class owning, operating or maintaining its own gas, water, power, light, or heat system shall furnish any person applying therefor, along the line of its pipes, mains, wires, or other conduits, subject to reasonable rules and regulations, with gas, water, power, light, or heat. Such city shall regulate and fix the rental or rate for gas, water, power, light, or heat and regulate and fix the charges for water meters, power meters, gas meters, light meters, or heat meters or other device or means necessary for determining the consumption of gas, water, power, light, or heat. Such city shall require water meters, gas meters, light meters, power meters, or heat meters to be used, or other device or means necessary for determining the consumption of gas, water, power, light, or heat.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 57, p. 275;

R.S.1913, § 4957;

C.S.1922, § 4126;

C.S.1929, § 16-655;

Laws 1937, c. 23, § 1, p. 146;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-655;

R.S.1943, § 16-681;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 139.
July 21, 2016
Water service to persons outside the corporate limits of the city is contractual and permissive. Burger v. City of Beatrice, 181 Neb. 213, 147 N.W.2d 784 (1967).